Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.190

Actions to enforce chapter—Who may bring—Relief.

The attorney general or the prosecuting attorney of any county in which a private vocational school or agent of the school is found may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction for the enforcement of this chapter. The court may issue an injunction or grant any other appropriate form of relief.

[ 1986 c 299 s 19.]